Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2933
State and local taxation; exemption.

An obligation that is issued under the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act, the transfer of such obligation, and the income from such issuance and transfer, including the profit from the sale of such obligation, shall be exempt from state and local taxation.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 33.
July 18, 2026